Massachusetts, session 194th, H514.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the board
of elementary and secondary education shall repromulgate 603 CMR 7.03(3) as necessary to
establish the requirement that all approved programs for teachers include instruction on the
appropriate use of augmentative and alternative communication and other assistive technologies;
provided further the board may require that individual professional development plans required
by section 38G of chapter 71 address the learning needs of students who are nonverbal or have
limited speech requiring augmentative and alternative communication.
of 1